Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 36 WATER QUALITY
§ 39-3614. Duties of the basin advisory group.

Each basin advisory group shall meet as necessary to conduct the group’s business and to provide general coordination of the water quality programs of all public agencies pertinent to each basin. Duties of the basin advisory groups shall include, but not be limited to, providing advice to the director for:

Determining priorities for monitoring;

Revisions in the beneficial uses designated for each stream and the status and attainability of designated or existing beneficial uses for the water bodies within the basin;

Assigning water bodies to the categories described in section 39-3609, Idaho Code;

Reviewing the development and implementation of total maximum daily load processes as described in section 39-3611, Idaho Code;

Suggesting members of the watershed advisory groups described in section 39-3615, Idaho Code; and

Establishing priorities for water quality programs within the basin based on the economic resources available to implement such programs.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the director and the basin advisory groups shall employ all means of public involvement deemed necessary, including the public involvement required by section 39-3603, Idaho Code, or required in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and shall cooperate fully with the public involvement or planning processes of other appropriate public agencies.

§ 39-3615. Creation of watershed advisory groups.

Basin advisory groups shall identify representatives of the industries and other interests affected by the management of water quality within a watershed who are prospective members of an advisory group for the watershed and shall advise the director of their findings. The director, upon the advice of the appropriate basin advisory group, shall name watershed advisory groups which will generally advise the department on the appropriateness, attainability and status of existing and designated beneficial uses and water quality criteria within the watershed, and on the development and implementation of TMDLs and other state water quality plans, including those specific actions needed to control point and nonpoint sources of pollution within the watersheds of those water bodies where designated beneficial uses are not fully supported. Each watershed advisory group shall be formed early enough to complete consultation, as provided in section 39-3611(8), Idaho Code, prior to the date the TMDL and any supporting subbasin assessment is scheduled to be submitted to the United States environmental protection agency for approval.

If the members of the watershed advisory group, with the concurrence of the basin advisory group, advise the director that applicable water quality standards within the watershed are not attainable or are inappropriate based upon supporting data, the director shall initiate the process or processes to assess such standards and to change or remove the standards that are shown by the assessment to be unattainable or inappropriate, consistent with this chapter.

Members of each watershed advisory group shall be representative of the industries and interests affected by the management of that watershed and shall, where appropriate, include a representative from each of the following: agriculture, mining, point source dischargers, forest products, local government, livestock, Indian tribes (for areas within reservation boundaries), water-based recreation, environmental interests and the land managing or regulatory agencies with an interest in the management of that watershed and the quality of the water bodies within it.

Members of each watershed advisory group shall serve and shall not be reimbursed for their expenses during their term of service.

§ 39-3616. Duties of each watershed advisory group.

Each watershed advisory group shall generally be responsible for recommending those specific actions needed to control point and nonpoint sources of pollution within the watershed so that, within reasonable periods of time, designated beneficial uses are fully supported and other state water quality plans are achieved. Watershed advisory groups shall, as described in this chapter, consult with the director and participate in the development of each TMDL and any supporting subbasin assessment for water bodies within the watershed, and shall develop and recommend actions needed to effectively control sources of pollution. In carrying out the provisions of this section, the director and the watershed advisory groups shall employ all means of public involvement deemed necessary or required in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and shall cooperate fully with the public involvement or planning processes of other appropriate public agencies.

§ 39-3617. Designation of outstanding resource waters.

Any person may request, in writing to the board of environmental quality, that a stream segment may be considered for designation as an outstanding resource water. The board shall recommend to the legislature those stream segments the board proposes for designation as outstanding resource waters. The legislature shall determine by law which such stream segments to designate as outstanding resource waters. Stream segments so designated shall be included in a list of outstanding resource waters to be compiled and updated by the department of environmental quality in its rules governing water quality standards. Interim status or special protection shall not be provided to streams recommended by the board prior to legislative designation as an outstanding resource water. No state agency shall delay actions, or deny or delay the processing or approval of any permit for a nonpoint source activity based on nomination of a segment for designation as an outstanding resource water, or while the legislature is considering such designation.

§ 39-3618. Restriction provisions for new nonpoint source activities on outstanding resource waters.

No person shall conduct a new or substantially modify an existing nonpoint source activity that can reasonably be expected to lower the water quality of an outstanding resource water, except for short-term or temporary nonpoint source activities which do not alter the essential character or special uses of a segment, issuance of water rights permits or licenses, allocation of water rights, or operation of water diversions or impoundments.

§ 39-3619. Continuation provisions for existing activities on outstanding resource waters.

Existing activities may continue and shall be conducted in a manner that maintains and protects the current water quality of an outstanding resource water. The provisions of this section shall not affect short-term or temporary activities that do not alter the essential character or special uses of a segment, allocation of water rights, or operations of water diversions or impoundments, provided that such activities shall be conducted in conformance with applicable laws and regulations.

§ 39-3620. Approval provisions for best management practices for new nonpoint source activities on or affecting outstanding resource waters.

No person may conduct a new nonpoint source activity on or affecting an outstanding resource water, except for a short-term or temporary activity as set forth in section 39-3602, Idaho Code, prior to approval by the designated agency as provided in this section.

Within six (6) months of designation of an outstanding resource water by the legislature, the designated agency shall develop best management practices for reasonably foreseeable new nonpoint source activities. In developing best management practices the designated agencies shall:

Solicit technical advice from state and federal agencies, research institutions, and universities and consult with affected landowners, land managers, operators, and the public;

Shall assure that all public participation processes required by law have been completed, but if no public participation process is required by law, will require public notification and the opportunity to comment; and

Recommend proposed best management practices to the board of environmental quality.

The board of environmental quality and designated agencies shall adopt the proposed best management practices that are in compliance with the rules and regulations governing water quality standards, and based on the recommendations of the designated agency and the comments received during the public participation process;

After adoption, these best management practices will be known as the outstanding resource water best management practices and will be published by the designated agency. Outstanding resource water approved best management practices will be reviewed and revised where needed by the designated agency every four (4) years in consultation with the department, landowners, federal managers, operators and the public to determine conformance with objectives of this chapter;

Following adoption of best management practices, the designated agency shall require implementation of applicable outstanding resource water best management practices which will assure that water quality of an outstanding resource water is not lowered;

Where outstanding resource water best management practices have not been adopted as set forth in subsections (1) through (4) of this section, the designated agency shall:

Assure that all public participation processes required by law have been completed, but if no public participation process is required by law, the designated agency shall provide for public notification of the new activity and the opportunity to comment;

Determine that the site-specific best management practices selected for a new nonpoint source activity are designed to ensure that water quality of the outstanding resource water is not lowered; and

Provide for review by the department that the activity is in compliance with rules and regulations governing water quality standards.

§ 39-3621. Monitoring provisions.

The designated agencies, in cooperation with the appropriate land management agency and the department shall ensure best management practices are monitored for their effect on water quality. The monitoring results shall be presented to the department on a schedule agreed to between the designated agency and the department.

§ 39-3622. Enforcement provisions.

The designated agency shall ensure that the approved outstanding resource water best management practices are implemented for new nonpoint source activities. If a person fails to obtain approval from a designated agency for a new nonpoint source activity as set forth in section 39-3620, Idaho Code, or if a person fails to implement approved best management practices and water quality is lowered, the designated agency may institute a civil action for an immediate injunction to halt the activity or pursue other remedies provided by law.

Nothing in this act shall restrict the enforcement authority of the department or designated agencies as provided by law.

§ 39-3623. Effect of rules.

Every rule promulgated within the authority conferred in sections 39-3617 through 39-3622, Idaho Code, shall be of temporary effect and shall become permanent only by enactment of statute at the first regular session following adoption of the rule. Rules not approved in the above manner shall be rejected, null, void and of no force and effect on July 1, following submission of the rules to the legislature.

The rules promulgated within the authority conferred in this act and adopted by the board of health and welfare on January 31, 1990, and contained in IDAPA 16.01.2003,31 and 16.01.2003,32 and 16.01.2053,01 through 16.01.2053,07, are hereby approved by the legislature.

The rules promulgated within the authority conferred in this act and adopted by the board of environmental quality on November 10, 2010, and contained in IDAPA 58.01.02.010, 58.01.02.051 and 58.01.02.052, and on November 19, 2014, and contained in IDAPA 58.01.02.060 and 58.01.02.010 are hereby approved by the legislature. A mixing zone approved by the department shall be subject to the applicable laws and rules for mixing zones in effect at the time it is approved and such mixing zone shall remain effective until the applicable permit is renewed or modified.

§ 39-3624. Declaration of policy — Designation of director.

The legislature, recognizing that water is one of the state’s most valuable natural resources, has adopted water quality and public drinking water standards and authorized the director of the department of environmental quality to implement these standards. In order to provide and maintain maximum water quality in the state for domestic, industrial, agricultural (irrigation and stockwatering), mining, manufacturing, electric power generation, municipal, fish culture, artificial ground water recharge, transportation and recreational purposes and to provide safe drinking water to the public at the earliest possible date, and to conform to the expressed intent of congress to abate pollution of ground waters, streams and lakes and to provide safe drinking water to the public, the legislature declares the purpose of this chapter is to enhance and preserve the quality and value of the water resources of the state of Idaho and to assist in the prevention, control, abatement and monitoring of water pollution. In consequence of the benefits resulting to the public health, welfare and economy it is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Idaho to protect this natural resource and to provide safe drinking water to the public by assisting in monitoring, preventing and controlling water pollution; to support and aid technical and planning research leading to the prevention and control of water pollution; to provide financial and technical assistance to municipalities and other agencies in the abatement and prevention of water pollution; and to provide financial and technical assistance to community water systems and nonprofit noncommunity water systems. The director of the department of environmental quality shall administer this chapter and nothing herein shall be construed as impairing or in any manner affecting the statutory authority or jurisdiction of municipalities in providing domestic water, sewage collection and treatment.

§ 39-3625. Definitions.

“Sewage treatment works” means any facility for the purpose of collecting, treating, neutralizing or stabilizing sewage or industrial wastes of a liquid nature, including treatment by disposal plants, the necessary intercepting, outfall and outlet sewers, pumping stations integral to such plants or sewers, equipment and furnishings thereof and their appurtenances.

“Community water system” means a public drinking water system that serves at least fifteen (15) service connections used by year-round residents or serves at least twenty-five (25) year-round residents.

“Nonprofit noncommunity water system” means a public drinking water system that is not a community water system and is governed by section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code and includes, but is not limited to: state agencies, municipalities and nonprofit organizations such as churches and schools.

“Construction” means the erection, building, acquisition, alteration, reconstruction, improvement or extension of sewage treatment works or best management practices, preliminary planning to determine the economic and engineering feasibility of sewage treatment works, community public water systems, nonprofit noncommunity public water systems or best management practices, the engineering, architectural, legal, fiscal and economic investigations, reports and studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, and other action necessary in the construction of sewage treatment works, community public water systems, nonprofit noncommunity public water systems or best management practices, and the inspection and supervision of the construction of sewage treatment works, community public water systems, nonprofit noncommunity public water systems or best management practices.

“Eligible construction project” means a project for construction of sewage treatment works, community public water systems, nonprofit noncommunity public water systems or for a project for the application of best management practices as set forth in the approved state water quality plan, in related project areas:

For which approval of the Idaho board of environmental quality is required under section 39-118, Idaho Code;

Which is, in the judgment of the Idaho board of environmental quality, eligible for water pollution abatement assistance or for provision of safe drinking water, whether or not federal funds are then available therefor;

Which conforms with applicable rules of the Idaho board of environmental quality;

Which is, in the judgment of the Idaho board of environmental quality, necessary for the accomplishment of the state’s policy of water purity as stated in section 39-3601, Idaho Code; and

Which is needed, in the judgment of the Idaho board of environmental quality, to correct existing water pollution problems or public health hazards and to provide reasonable reserve capacity to prevent future water pollution problems or public health hazards or to provide for safe drinking water.

“Municipality” means any county, city, special service district, nonprofit corporation or other governmental entity having authority to dispose of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes, or to provide for safe drinking water, any Indian tribe or authorized Indian tribal organization, or any combination of two (2) or more of the foregoing acting jointly, in connection with an eligible project.

“Board” means the Idaho board of environmental quality.

“Department” means the Idaho department of environmental quality.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho department of environmental quality.

“Nondomestic wastewater” means wastewater whose source of contamination is not principally human excreta.

“Best management practice” means practices, techniques or measures identified in the state water quality plan which are determined to be the most effective, practicable means of preventing or reducing pollutants generated from nonpoint sources to a level compatible with water quality goals.

“Nonpoint source pollution” means water pollution that comes from many varied, nonspecific and diffused sources and can be categorized by the general land disturbing activity that causes the pollution.

“Training program” means any course of training established to provide sewage treatment plant operating personnel and public drinking water system personnel with increased knowledge to improve their ability to operate and maintain sewage treatment works and public drinking water systems.

§ 39-3626. Authorization of grants and loans — Designation of administering agency — Reservation of funds for operations — Criteria — Priority projects — Eligible projects.

The state of Idaho is hereby authorized to make grants and loans at or below market interest rates, as funds are available, to any municipality to assist said municipality in the construction of sewage treatment works, to community public water systems and nonprofit noncommunity public water systems. The state of Idaho is hereby also authorized to make loans at or below market interest rates for the implementation of a management program established under section 319 of the federal water pollution control act, as amended.

The department of environmental quality may use a portion of the interest revenues from wastewater and drinking water loans, in an amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of loans outstanding, subject to annual appropriation, for operation of the wastewater and drinking water loan programs.

The Idaho board of environmental quality through the department of environmental quality shall be the agency for administration of funds authorized for grants or loans under this chapter, and may reserve up to four percent (4%) of the moneys accruing annually to the water pollution control and wastewater facility loan funds to be appropriated annually for the purpose of operating the water quality programs established pursuant to this chapter. The board may also reserve up to six percent (6%) of the moneys accruing annually to the water pollution control fund to be appropriated annually for the purpose of conducting water quality studies including monitoring.

In allocating state construction grants and loans under this chapter, the Idaho board of environmental quality shall give consideration to water pollution control needs, protection of public health and provision of safe drinking water.

Pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the Idaho board of environmental quality shall establish an integrated list of priority municipal sewage facility and nonpoint source pollution control projects and a list of priority community and nonprofit noncommunity public water systems.

The Idaho board of environmental quality through the department of environmental quality may transfer funds between the wastewater facility loan account and the drinking water loan account [drinking water loan fund]. Such transfers shall be listed in the annual intended use plan and approved by the Idaho board of environmental quality.

§ 39-3627. Payments by state board of environmental quality — Contracts with municipalities and community and nonprofit noncommunity public water systems — Rules — Approval of attorney general — Audit of payments.

The Idaho board of environmental quality may make payments not to exceed ninety percent (90%) of the estimated reasonable cost of an eligible construction project funded by a grant. Payments may be made which are equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the estimated reasonable cost of an eligible construction project funded by a loan.

The Idaho board of environmental quality may, in the name of the state of Idaho, enter into contracts with municipalities and community and nonprofit noncommunity public water systems and any such municipality and community and nonprofit noncommunity public water system may enter into a contract with the Idaho board of environmental quality, concerning eligible construction projects. Any such contract may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, and shall include, in substance, the following provisions:

An estimate of the reasonable cost of the project as determined by the Idaho board of environmental quality.

An agreement by the municipality or community and nonprofit noncommunity public drinking water system, binding for the actual service life of the sewage treatment works or the actual service life of the community and nonprofit noncommunity public drinking water system:

To proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the project in accordance with plans approved pursuant to section 39-118, Idaho Code.

To commence operation of the sewage treatment works or community and nonprofit noncommunity public drinking water system on completion of the project, and not to discontinue operation or dispose of the sewage treatment works or community and nonprofit noncommunity public drinking water system without the approval of the board of environmental quality.

To operate and maintain the sewage treatment works or community and nonprofit noncommunity public drinking water system in accordance with applicable provisions and rules of the board.

To make available on an equitable basis the services of the sewage treatment works or community and nonprofit noncommunity public drinking water system to the residents and commercial and industrial establishments of areas it was designed to serve.

To provide for the payment of the municipality’s share or the community and nonprofit noncommunity public drinking water system’s share of the cost of the project when the project is built using grant funds.

To develop and to secure the approval of the department of plans for the operation and maintenance of the sewage treatment works or community and nonprofit noncommunity public drinking water system; and of plans and programs for the recovery of the capital costs and operating expenses of the works or system.

To allow the board to make loans of up to one hundred percent (100%) and supplemental grants based upon financial capability to a municipality for the estimated reasonable cost of an eligible project, which may include treatment of nondomestic wastewater.

To provide for the accumulation of funds through the use of taxing powers, through charges made for services, through revenue bonds, or otherwise, for the purposes of: (1) capital replacement, (2) future improvement, betterment, and extension of such works occasioned by increased wastewater loadings on the works, and (3) establishing a fund dedicated solely to repayment of principal and interest of loans made subsequent to this chapter.
(ix) To commence annual principal and interest payments not later than one (1) year from the date construction is completed and to provide for full amortization of loans not later than thirty (30) years from the date project construction is completed.

The terms under which the Idaho board of environmental quality may unilaterally terminate the contract and/or seek repayment from the municipality or community and nonprofit noncommunity public drinking water system of sums already paid pursuant to the contract for noncompliance by the municipality with the terms and conditions of the contract and the provisions of this chapter.

The board of environmental quality may, in the name of the state of Idaho, enter into loan contracts with applicants for the implementation of nonpoint source pollution control programs. To be eligible for a loan the project proposed by an applicant must be consistent with the state nonpoint source management plan. Up to twenty percent (20%) of the total state revolving loan fund may be used for nonpoint source pollution control projects which demonstrate a benefit/nexus to a municipality.

The board may adopt rules necessary for the making and enforcing of contracts hereunder and establishing procedures to be followed in applying for state construction grants or loans or training grants herein authorized as shall be necessary for the effective administration of the grants and loans program.

All contracts entered into pursuant to this section shall be subject to approval by the attorney general as to form. All payments by the state pursuant to such contracts shall be made after audit and upon warrant as provided by law on vouchers approved by the director.

§ 39-3628. Water pollution control fund established.

There is hereby created and established in the state treasury a separate fund to be known as the water pollution control fund. The fund shall have paid into it:

The moneys provided for in section 63-3638, Idaho Code, that are paid over to the state treasurer shall be deposited to the credit of the water pollution control fund, and not to the credit of the state general fund;

All donations and grants from any source which may be used for the provisions of this act;

Any other funds which may hereafter be provided by law.

§ 39-3629. Wastewater facility loan account established.

There is hereby created and established in the agency asset fund in the state treasury an account to be known as the wastewater facility loan account. Surplus moneys in the wastewater facility loan account shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for idle state moneys in the state treasury under section 67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest received on all such investments shall be paid into the wastewater facility loan account. The account shall have paid into it:

Federal funds which are received by the state to provide for wastewater facility loans together with required state matching funds coming from a portion of the moneys in the water pollution control account as established in section 39-3628, Idaho Code;

All donations and grants from any source which may be used for the provisions of this section;

All principal and interest repayments of loans made pursuant to this chapter;

Fund transfers from the drinking water loan account [drinking water loan fund]; and

Any other moneys which may hereafter be provided by law.

§ 39-3630. Appropriation of water pollution control fund — Purpose of chapter.

Moneys in the water pollution control fund are hereby perpetually appropriated for the following purposes:

To provide revenue for the payment of general obligation bonds issued pursuant to section 39-3633, Idaho Code, and general obligation refunding bonds issued pursuant to chapter 115, 1973 laws of the state of Idaho.

To provide payments for contracts entered into pursuant to this chapter.

To provide funds to capitalize the wastewater facility loan account established in section 39-3629, Idaho Code, including the required matching share of federal capitalization funds.

To provide funds to capitalize the drinking water loan account established in section 39-7602, Idaho Code, including the required matching share of federal capitalization funds.

Pending such expenditure or use, surplus moneys in the water pollution control fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for idle state moneys in the state treasury by section 67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest received on all such investments shall be paid into the water pollution control fund.

§ 39-3631. Appropriation of wastewater facility loan fund — Purpose of chapter.

Moneys in the wastewater facility loan fund are hereby perpetually appropriated for the following purposes:

To provide loans and other forms of financial assistance authorized under title VI of the federal water quality act of 1987, P.L. 100-4, to any municipality for construction of sewage treatment works.

To provide funds, subject to annual federal and state appropriation and applicable federal limitations, for operation of the wastewater facility loan program by the department of environmental quality.

§ 39-3632. Grants and loans for design, planning or construction — Limits on amount of grants and loans.

The board of environmental quality may divide financial assistance for eligible construction projects into separate grants, loans or a combination of grants and loans for the design, planning, and construction stages of project development. The making of a grant or loan for early stages of a project does not obligate the state to make a grant or loans for later stages of the same project.

The board may make grants from the water pollution control fund; provided, that the projected payments for such grants would not cause the projected balance in the fund to fall below zero at any time. All grant payments shall be subject to the availability of moneys in the fund.

The board may make loans from the wastewater facility loan fund, provided that the projected payments for such loans would not cause the projected balance in the fund to fall below zero at any time. All loan payments shall be subject to the availability of moneys in the fund.

§ 39-3633. Water pollution control bonds.

Water pollution control bonds, as provided by section 5, article VIII of the constitution of the state of Idaho, shall be authorized by resolution of the state board of environmental quality. The bonds may be issued in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may be in such denomination or denominations, may mature at such time or times, may mature in such amount or amounts, may bear interest at the most advantageous rate or rates available to the state at the time offered, payable semiannually, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may carry such registration and such conversion privileges, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, may be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution or other resolutions may provide. The bonds, if sold to a federal agency, may be sold at a private sale at not less than par and accrued interest, without advertising the same at competitive bidding. If not sold to a federal agency, the bonds shall be sold publicly in a manner to be provided by the state board of environmental quality. The bonds shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code.

The moneys derived from the sale of any bonds shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the water pollution control fund for the purposes of that fund.

All bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be obligations of the state and shall be payable in accordance with the terms of this chapter and the provisions of section 5, article VIII of the constitution of the state of Idaho.

§ 39-3634. Cottage site defined.

“Cottage site” is defined as a state owned lot containing one (1) acre or less which is or may be leased by the state of Idaho primarily for recreational or homesite use by a lessee.

§ 39-3635. Cottage site leases — Requirements — Construction of sewage disposal facilities — Connection to water and sewer district systems — Payment of charges — Notification of defaults — Satisfaction of requirements.

After the effective date of sections 39-3634 through 39-3639, Idaho Code, all cottage site leases authorized by the state of Idaho shall require that each lessee must construct, at his cost and expense, sewage disposal facilities, certified by the director of the department of environmental quality as adequate, as follows:

For all new cottage or house construction completed after July 1, 1971 on any cottage site the certificate shall be issued prior to occupancy.

Those cottages or houses existing on the cottage sites prior to the effective date of sections 39-3634 through 39-3639, Idaho Code, shall meet those standards required by the director of the department of environmental quality for certification within two (2) years of the effective date of sections 39-3634 through 39-3639, Idaho Code, unless a public or private sewage collection or disposal system is being planned or constructed in which case the director of the department of environmental quality may grant extensions on a year by year basis but not exceed three (3) such extensions for any one (1) cottage site.

Isolated dwellings on sites situated on mining, grazing or other similar types of state land board leases shall not be affected unless within two hundred (200) yards of any flowing stream or a lake.

Wherever any cottage site is located within the boundaries of a district organized for water or sewer purposes, or a combination thereof, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code, as amended, the cottage site lessee shall connect his property to the sewer system of the district within sixty (60) days after written notice from the district so to do, provided, however, no cottage site lessee shall be compelled to connect his property with such sewer system unless a service line is brought by the district to a point within two hundred (200) feet of his dwelling place. All cottage site leases hereafter issued shall require, as a condition of acceptance thereof by the lessee, that the lessee will connect his property to a district sewer system as required in this subsection (2). With respect to all cottage site leases issued subsequent to July 1, 1970, filing with the department issuing the lease of evidence of connection to the district sewer system as contemplated in this subsection (2) shall be conclusive evidence of compliance by the cottage site lessee with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and of the provisions of the cottage site lease to provide sewage disposal facilities at the expense of the cottage site lessee. Each cottage site lessee whose cottage site is subject to connection to a district sewer system as required in this subsection (2) shall pay to the district to which the cottage site is required to be connected, in a timely manner and when due, all connection fees and charges, all monthly rates, tolls and charges, as provided by chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code, as amended, and all special benefits payments in lieu of tax payments provided for in subsection (3) of this section.

Notwithstanding that title to a cottage site remains in the state of Idaho, each cottage site lessee shall pay to any district operating a sewer system to which the cottage site is connected as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each year in the same manner and at the same time as county taxes are paid and collected a sum of money in lieu of taxes equal to the sum which would have been paid had the cottage site been held in private ownership, hereinafter called special benefits payments. The special benefits payments shall be computed by applying the millage levy of the district to the cottage site in the ordinary course to the assessed valuation of the property as determined by the county assessor of the county in which the cottage site is located. No special benefits payments shall be imposed prior to January 1, 1980. The cottage site lessee shall have such rights of protest, hearings and appeals with respect to the valuation of the cottage site for purposes of determining the special benefits payments as if such cottage site were held in private ownership.
It shall be the duty of the county assessor to establish the value of each cottage site as compared to like property upon the request, in writing, of the district.

Each water and sewer district shall immediately notify the department issuing a cottage site lease of the failure of any cottage site lessee to connect to the district sewer system, or to pay any connection fee or charge, monthly rate, toll or charge, or any special benefits payments, all as required or provided for in subsection (3) of this section. Any such notification shall set forth the amount of any such fees, charges or payments which are delinquent.

Approval, pursuant to the provisions of section 39-118, Idaho Code, by the department of environmental quality of the plans and specifications of a sewer system to be constructed, acquired, improved or extended by a water and sewer district shall, as to all cottage sites connected to the district sewer system, satisfy the requirements of section 39-3637, Idaho Code.

The state of Idaho, its boards, agencies or departments, shall not be liable, directly or indirectly, for any connection fees and charges, monthly rates, tolls and charges, or special benefits payments charged to cottage site lessees beyond those fees or payments collected from new lessees pursuant to section 58-304A, Idaho Code, and placed in the revolving fund created by section 58-141A, Idaho Code.